California statutes. Revenue and Taxation Code
(3) For taxpayers that are required to be included in a combined report under Section 25101 or authorized to be included in a combined report under Section 25101.15, the amount prescribed in paragraph (1) shall apply to the aggregate amount of preapportioned income for all members included in a combined report.

(f) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), this section shall not apply to a taxpayer that ceased to do business or has a final taxable year ending prior to August 28, 2008, that sold or transferred substantially all of its assets resulting in a gain on sale during a taxable year ending prior to August 28, 2008, for which the gain could be offset with
 existing net operating loss deductions and the sale or transfer occurred pursuant to a plan of reorganization under Chapter 11 of Title 11 of the United States Code. An amended tax return claiming net operating loss deductions allowed pursuant to this subdivision shall be treated as a timely filed original return.

(g) The Legislature finds and declares that the addition of subdivision (f) to this section by the act adding this subdivision fulfills a statewide public purpose by providing necessary tax relief for a taxpayer that ceased to do business or has a final taxable year ending prior to August 28, 2008, that sold or transferred substantially all of its assets resulting in a gain or sale during a taxable year prior to August 28, 2008, for which the gain could be offset with existing net operating loss deductions and the sale or transfer occurred
 pursuant to a plan of reorganization under Chapter 11 of Title 11 of the United States Code, in order to ensure that these taxpayers are not permanently denied the net operating loss deduction.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 236, Sec. 41.   (SB 1435)   Effective September 14, 2026.   Applicable to taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2025, provided in Section 46\nof Stats. 2026, Ch. 236.)
-------------------------------------------

24416.22.

Notwithstanding Section 24416.1, 24416.4, or 22416.7, or Section 24416.2, 24416.5, or 24416.6, as those sections read on November 30, 2014, to the contrary, a net operating loss attributable to a taxable year beginning on or after January 1, 2008, shall be a net operating carryover to each of the 20 taxable years following the year of the loss, and a net operating loss attributable to a taxable year beginning on or after January 1, 2013, and before January 1, 2019, shall also be a net operating loss carryback to each of the two taxable years preceding the taxable year of loss.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 236, Sec. 42.   (SB 1435)   Effective September 14, 2026.   Applicable to taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2025, provided in Section 46\nof Stats. 2026, Ch. 236.)
-------------------------------------------

24416.23.

(a) Notwithstanding Sections 24416, 24416.1, 24416.4, 24416.7, and 24416.22, former Sections 24416.2, 24416.5, 24416.6, and 24416.20, and Section 172 of the Internal Revenue Code, a net operating loss deduction shall not be allowed for any taxable year beginning on or after January 1, 2020, and before January 1, 2022.

(b) For any net operating loss or carryover of a net operating loss for which a deduction is denied by subdivision (a), the carryover period under Section 172 of the Internal Revenue Code shall be extended as follows:

(1) By one year, for losses incurred in taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2021, and before January 1, 2022.

(2) By two years, for losses incurred in taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2020, and before January 1, 2021.

(3) By three years, for losses incurred in taxable years beginning before January 1, 2020.

(c) The disallowance of any net operating loss deduction for any taxable year beginning on or after January 1, 2020, and before January 1, 2022, pursuant to subdivision (a) shall not apply to a taxpayer with income subject to tax under this part of less than one million dollars ($1,000,000) for the taxable year.

(d) The amendments made to this section by the act adding this subdivision shall be operative for taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2022.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 3, Sec. 21.   (SB 113)   Effective February 9, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

24416.24.

(a) Notwithstanding Sections 24416, 24416.1, 24416.4, 24416.7, and 24416.22, former Sections 24416.2, 24416.5, 24416.6, and 24416.20, and Section 172 of the Internal Revenue Code, a net operating loss deduction shall not be allowed for any taxable year beginning on or after January 1, 2024, and before January 1, 2027.

(b) For any net operating loss or carryover of a net operating loss for which a deduction is denied by subdivision (a), the carryover period under Section 172 of the Internal Revenue Code shall be extended as follows:

(1) By one year, for losses incurred in taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2025, and before January 1, 2026.

(2) By two years, for losses incurred in taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2024, and before January 1, 2025.

(3) By three years, for losses incurred in taxable years beginning before January 1, 2024.

(c) The disallowance of any net operating loss deduction for any taxable year beginning on or after January 1, 2024, and before January 1, 2027, pursuant to subdivision (a) shall not apply to a taxpayer with income subject to tax under this part of less than one million dollars ($1,000,000) for the taxable year.

(d) (1) For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2025, and before January 1, 2026, this section shall not apply if, by May
 14, 2025, the Director of Finance determines that General Fund money over the multiyear forecast is sufficient without the revenue impact of the net operating loss suspension and credit limitation, and pursuant to legislation in the annual Budget Act to not apply this section of law.

(2) For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2026, and before January 1, 2027, this section shall not apply if, by May 14, 2026, the Director of Finance determines that General Fund money over the multiyear forecast is sufficient without the revenue impact of the net operating loss suspension and credit limitation, and pursuant to legislation in the annual Budget Act to not apply this section of law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 42, Sec. 13.   (SB 175)   Effective June 29, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Items Not Deductible [24421. - 24449.]

24421.

In computing “net income” of taxpayers under this part, no deduction shall be allowed for the items specified in this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 938.)
-------------------------------------------

24422.

No deduction shall be allowed for both of the following:

(a) Any amount paid out for new buildings or for permanent improvements or betterments made to increase the value of any property or estate. This subdivision shall not apply to:

(1) Expenditures for the development of mines or deposits
 deductible under Section 616 of the Internal Revenue Code.

(2) Soil and water conservation expenditures deductible under Section 24369.

(3) Expenditures for farmers for fertilizer, etc., deductible under Section 24377.

(4) Research and experimental expenditures deductible under Section 24365.

(5) Expenditures for which a deduction is allowed under Section 24356.7.

(6) Expenditures for removal of architectural and transportation barriers to the handicapped and elderly that the taxpayer elects to deduct under Section 24383.

(b) Any amount expended in restoring property or in making good the exhaustion thereof for which an
 allowance is or has been made.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 296, Sec. 285.   (AB 1023)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

24422.3.

(a) Section 263A of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to capitalization and inclusion in inventory costs of certain expenses, shall apply, except as otherwise provided.

(b) (1) For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2019, the amendments made by Section 13102(b) of the Tax Cuts and Jobs Act (Public Law 115-97) to
 Section 263A of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to capitalization and inclusion in inventory cost of certain expenses, shall apply, except as otherwise provided.

(2) (A) Any change in method of accounting made pursuant to this subdivision shall be treated for purposes of applying Section 24721, as initiated by the taxpayer and made with the consent of the Franchise Tax Board.

(B) Section 13102(e)(1) of the Tax Cuts and Jobs Act (Public Law 115-97) does not apply to this subdivision.

(C) Notwithstanding subparagraph (B), a taxpayer may elect to apply the provisions of this subdivision to taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2018, and before January 1, 2019.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 39, Sec. 27.   (AB 91)   Effective July 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

24424.

Section 264 of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to certain amounts paid in connection with insurance contracts, shall apply, except as otherwise provided.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 35, Sec. 52.   Effective May 8, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

24425.

(a) No deduction shall be allowed for any amount otherwise allowable as a deduction which is allocable to one or more classes of income not included in the measure of the tax imposed by this part, regardless of whether that income was received or accrued during the taxable year.

(b) No deduction shall be allowed for any expense described in paragraphs (1) or (2) that is paid or incurred to an insurer if the insurer is a member of the taxpayer’s commonly controlled group and
 the amount paid or incurred would constitute income to the insurer if the insurer were subject to the California income or franchise tax.

(1) An expense described in this paragraph means any of the following interest amounts payable to an insurer in the same commonly controlled group:

(A) (i) Interest paid or incurred to an insurer in the taxpayer’s commonly controlled group with respect to indebtedness (other than qualified marketable debt instruments), the principal amount of which is attributable to a contribution of money by a noninsurer member of the taxpayer’s commonly controlled group to the capital of an insurer member of that group, including the principal amount of a loan arising from a direct or indirect transfer of money from that contribution to capital from one insurer to another insurer of the same commonly controlled group.

(ii) Interest paid or incurred to an insurer with respect to a note or other debt instrument (other than qualified marketable debt instruments) contributed to the capital of an insurer with respect to its stock by a noninsurer member of the commonly controlled group.

(iii) For purposes of this subparagraph, “qualified marketable debt instruments” means publicly available debt instruments of all noninsurer members of the commonly controlled group issued, but only to the extent that the aggregate principal amount of publicly available debt instruments held by all insurer members of the commonly controlled group constitutes less than 10 percent of the total outstanding principal amount of publicly available debt instruments issued by all noninsurer members.

(iv) For purposes of this subparagraph, “publicly available debt
 instruments” means debt instruments available to the general public, including bonds, debentures, and negotiable instruments (as defined in Section 3104 of the California Commercial Code) that are rated by a nationally recognized statistical rating agency (as that term is used in Rule 15c3-1(c)(2)(vi)(F) under the Securities Exchange Act of 1934) in one of its generic rating categories that signifies investment grade.

(B) Interest paid or incurred within five years after the direct or indirect acquisition of the insurer by a member of the commonly controlled group (other than interest on qualified marketable debt instruments as defined in clause (iii) of subparagraph (A)).

(C) The amount of interest paid or incurred during the taxable year to any insurer in the commonly controlled group multiplied by the disqualifying percentage. The disqualifying percentage is an amount equal to
 100 percent less the percentage described in paragraph (1), (2), or (3) of subdivision (c) of Section 24410 (as the case may be) for that taxable year whether or not a dividend is paid or accrued.

(D) An amount of interest determined by multiplying the amount of interest paid or incurred to an insurer in the commonly controlled group by the ratio of the commonly controlled group determined under paragraph (1) of subdivision (d) of Section 24410 for the taxable year (whether or not a dividend was paid or accrued in that year).

(2) An expense described in this paragraph means any expense other than interest described by paragraph (1), that is either of the following:

(A) Attributable to property formerly held by the taxpayer or a member of the taxpayer’s commonly controlled group that was acquired by the insurer in a
 transaction in which gain was realized but not recognized (including for this purpose any income deferred under Section 24465) by the taxpayer or a member of its commonly controlled group.

(B) Attributable to property purchased with the proceeds attributable to a contribution by a noninsurer member of the taxpayers’ commonly controlled group to the capital of an insurer member of that group, including amounts attributable to a direct or indirect transfer of money from that contribution from one insurer to another insurer in the same group.

(3) For purposes of this subdivision, amounts that are described in more than one subparagraph of either paragraph (1) or (2) shall be included only in that subparagraph that will result in the highest disallowance amount.

(4) For purposes of this subdivision, the phrase “commonly
 controlled group” shall have the same meaning as that phrase has under Section 25105.

(5) For purposes of this subdivision, an insurer is an insurer within the meaning of Section 28 of Article XIII of the California Constitution, whether or not the insurer is engaged in business in California.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 868, Sec. 3.   Effective September 29, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

24426.

Amounts paid or accrued for such taxes and carrying charges as, under regulations prescribed by the Franchise Tax Board, are chargeable to capital account with respect to property, if the taxpayer elects, in accordance with such regulations, to treat such taxes or charges as so chargeable.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 938.)
-------------------------------------------

24427.

Section 267 of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to losses, expenses, and interest with respect to transactions between related taxpayers, shall apply, except as otherwise provided.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 359, Sec. 32.   (AB 154)   Effective September 30, 2015.   Applicable to taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2015, as provided in Sec. 41 of Stats. 2015, Ch. 359.)
-------------------------------------------

24428.

Section 267A of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to certain related party amounts paid or accrued in hybrid transactions or with hybrid entities, shall apply.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 231, Sec. 100.   (SB 711)   Effective October 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

24429.

Section 276 of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to certain indirect contributions to political parties, shall apply, except as otherwise provided.

(History: Added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 611, Sec. 89.   Effective October 3, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

24430.

The amendments made by Section 13304 of the Tax Cuts and Jobs Act, 2017 (Public Law 115-97) to Section 274 of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to limitation on deduction by employers of expenses for fringe benefits, shall not apply.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 231, Sec. 101.   (SB 711)   Effective October 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

24431.

(a) If—(1) Any person or persons acquire, or acquired on or after October 8, 1940, directly or indirectly, control of a corporation; or(2) Any corporation
 acquires, or acquired on or after October 8, 1940, directly or indirectly, property of another corporation, not controlled, directly or indirectly, immediately before such acquisition, by such acquiring corporation or its stockholders, the basis of which property, in the hands of the acquiring corporation, is determined by reference to the basis in the hands of the transferor corporation;and the principal purpose for which such acquisition was made is evasion or avoidance of tax under this part by securing the benefit of a deduction, credit, or other allowance which such person or corporation would not otherwise enjoy, then such deduction, credit, or other allowance shall not be allowed. For purposes of this subdivision, control means the ownership of stock possessing at least 50 percent of the total combined voting power of all classes of stock entitled to vote or at least 50 percent of the total value of shares of all classes of stock of the
 corporation.

(b) (1) If—(A) There is a qualified stock purchase by a corporation of another corporation,(B) An election is not made under Section 24519 with respect to that purchase, (C) The acquired corporation is liquidated pursuant to a plan of liquidation adopted not more than two years after the acquisition date, and(D) The principal purpose for that liquidation is the evasion or avoidance of tax under this part by securing the benefit of a deduction, credit, or other allowance which the
 acquiring corporation would not otherwise enjoy,then the Franchise Tax Board may disallow that deduction, credit, or other allowance.

(2) For purposes of paragraph (1), the terms “qualified stock purchase” and “acquisition date” have the same respective meanings as when used in Section 24519.

(c) In any case to which subdivision (a) applies, the Franchise Tax Board may do any of the following:

(1) Allow as a deduction, credit, or allowance any part of any amount disallowed by that section, if it determines that such allowance will not result in the evasion or avoidance of tax under this part for which the acquisition was made. 

(2) Distribute, apportion, or allocate gross income, and
 distribute, apportion, or allocate the deductions, credits, or allowances the benefit of which was sought to be secured, between or among the corporations, or properties, or parts thereof, involved, and to allow those deductions, credits, or allowances so distributed, apportioned, or allocated, but to give effect to that allowance only to the extent which it determines shall not result in the evasion or avoidance of tax under this part for which the acquisition was made.

(3) Exercise its powers, in part, under paragraph (1) and, in part, under paragraph (2).

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1461, Sec. 111.   Effective October 1, 1985.)
-------------------------------------------

24434.

(a) In the case of a taxpayer (other than a bank as defined in Section 23039) no deduction shall be allowed under Section 24347 or 24348 by reason of the worthlessness of any debt owed by a political party.

(b) (1) For purposes of subdivision (a), the term “political party” means any of the following:

(A) A political party. 

(B) A national, state, or local committee of a political party. 

(C) A committee, association, or organization which accepts contributions or makes expenditures for the purpose of influencing or attempting to influence the election of presidential or vice presidential electors or of any individual whose name is presented for election to any federal, state, or local elective public office, whether or not such individual is elected. 

(2) For purposes of paragraph (1)(C), the term “contributions” includes a gift, subscription, loan, advance, or deposit, of money, or anything of value, and includes a contract, promise, or agreement to make a contribution, whether or not legally enforceable. 

(3) For purposes of paragraph (1)(C), the term “expenditures” includes a payment, distribution, loan, advance,
 deposit, or gift, of money, or anything of value, and includes a contract, promise, or agreement to make an expenditure, whether or not legally enforceable. 

(c) In the case of a taxpayer who uses an accrual method of accounting, subdivision (a) shall not apply to a debt which accrued as a receivable on a bona fide sale of goods or services in the ordinary course of a taxpayer’s trade or business if both of the following apply:

(1) For the taxable year in which the receivable accrued, more than 30 percent of all receivables which accrued in the ordinary course of the trades or businesses of the taxpayer were due from political parties.

(2) The taxpayer made substantial continuing efforts to collect on the debt.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 862, Sec. 166.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

24436.1.

(a) In computing net income, deductions, including deductions for cost of goods sold, shall not be allowed to any taxpayer from any of its gross income directly derived from any act or omission of criminal profiteering activity, as defined in Section 186.2 of the Penal Code, or as defined in Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 11350) of Division 10 of the Health and Safety Code, or Article 5
 (commencing with Section 750) of Chapter 1 of Part 2 of Division 1 of the Insurance Code; and deductions shall not be allowed to any taxpayer on any of its gross income derived from any other activities which directly tend to promote or to further, or are directly connected or associated with, those acts or omissions.

(b) A prior, final determination by a court of competent jurisdiction of this state in any criminal proceedings or any proceeding in which the state, county, city and county, city, or other political subdivision was a party thereto on the merits of the legality of the activities of a taxpayer, or predecessor in interest of a taxpayer, shall be required in order for subdivision (a) to apply and shall be binding upon the Franchise Tax Board and the State Board of Equalization.

(c) (1) Except as provided in paragraphs (2) and (3), this section
 shall be applied with respect to taxable years that have not been closed by a statute of limitations, res judicata, or otherwise as of September 14, 1982.

(2) The amendments made to this section by Chapter 962 of the Statutes of 1984 shall be applied with respect to taxable years that have not been closed by a statute of limitations, res judicata, or otherwise as of January 1, 1985.

(3) The amendments made to this section by Chapter 454 of the Statutes of 2011 shall be applied with respect to taxable years that have not been closed by a statute of limitations, res judicata, or otherwise as of the effective date of that act.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 162, Sec. 173.   (SB 1171)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

24436.5.

(a) No deduction shall be allowed for interest, depreciation, taxes, or amortization paid or incurred in the taxable year under Section 24343, 24344, 24345, or 24349, with respect to substandard housing located in this state, except as provided in subdivision (e).

(b) “Substandard housing” means occupied dwellings from which the taxpayer derives rental income or unoccupied or abandoned dwellings for which both of the following apply:

(1) Either of the following occurs:

(A) For occupied dwellings from which the taxpayer derives rental income, a state or local government regulatory agency has determined that the housing violates state law or local codes dealing with health, safety, or building.

(B) For dwellings that are unoccupied or abandoned for at least 90 days, a state or local government regulatory agency has cited the housing for conditions that constitute a serious violation of state law or local codes dealing with health, safety, or building, and that constitute a threat to public health and safety.

(2) Either of the following occurs:

(A) After written notice of violation by the regulatory agency, specifying the
 applicability of this section, the housing has not been repaired or brought to a condition of compliance within six months after the date of the notice or the time prescribed in the notice, whichever period is later.

(B) Good faith efforts for compliance have not been commenced, as determined by the regulatory agency.

“Substandard housing” also means employee housing that has not, within 30 days of the date of the written notice of violation or the date for compliance prescribed in the written notice of violation, been brought into compliance with the conditions stated in the written notice of violation of the Employee Housing Act (Part 1 (commencing with Section 17000) of Division 13 of the Health and Safety Code) issued by the enforcement agency that specifies the application of this section. The regulatory agency may, for good cause shown, extend the compliance date prescribed in a violation
 notice.

(c) (1) When the period specified in paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) has expired without compliance, the government regulatory agency shall mail to the taxpayer a notice of noncompliance. The notice of noncompliance shall be in a form and shall include information prescribed by the Franchise Tax Board, shall be mailed by certified mail to the taxpayer at his or her last known address, and shall advise the taxpayer of (A) an intent to notify the Franchise Tax Board of the noncompliance within 10 days unless an appeal is filed, (B) where an appeal may be filed, and (C) a general description of the tax consequences of that filing with the Franchise Tax Board. Appeals shall be made to the same body and in the same manner as appeals from other actions of the regulatory agency. If no appeal is made within 10 days or if after disposition of the appeal the regulatory agency is sustained, the regulatory agency shall
 notify, in writing, the Franchise Tax Board of the noncompliance.

(2) The notice of noncompliance shall contain the legal description or the lot and block numbers of the real property, the assessor’s parcel number, and the name of the owner of record as shown on the latest equalized assessment roll. In addition, the regulatory agency shall, at the same time as notification of the notice of noncompliance is sent to the Franchise Tax Board, record a copy of the notice of noncompliance in the office of the recorder for the county in which the substandard housing is located that includes a statement of tax consequences that may be determined by the Franchise Tax Board. However, the failure to record a notice with the county recorder does not relieve the liability of any taxpayer nor does it create any liability on the part of the regulatory agency.

(3) The regulatory agency may charge
 the taxpayer a fee in an amount not to exceed the regulatory agency’s costs incurred in recording any notice of noncompliance or issuing any release of that notice. The notice of compliance shall be recorded and shall serve to expunge the notice of noncompliance. The notice of compliance shall contain the same recording information required for the notice of noncompliance. No deduction by the taxpayer, or any other taxpayer who obtains title to the property subsequent to the recordation of the notice of noncompliance, shall be allowed for the items provided in subdivision (a) from the date of the notice of noncompliance until the date the regulatory agency determines that the substandard housing has been brought to a condition of compliance. The regulatory agency shall mail to the Franchise Tax Board and the taxpayer a notice of compliance, which notice shall be in the form and include the information prescribed by the Franchise Tax Board. In the event the period of noncompliance does not cover an entire
 taxable year, the deductions shall be denied at the rate of112 for each full month during the period of noncompliance.

(4) If the property is owned by more than one owner or the recorded title is in the name of a fictitious owner, the notice requirements provided in subdivision (b) and this subdivision shall be satisfied for each owner if the notices are mailed to one owner or to the fictitious name owner at the address appearing on the latest available property tax bill. However, notices made pursuant to this subdivision shall not relieve the regulatory agency from furnishing taxpayer identification information required to implement this section to the Franchise Tax Board.

(d) For the purposes of this section, a notice of noncompliance shall not be mailed by the regulatory agency
 to the Franchise Tax Board if any of the following occur:

(1) The housing was rendered substandard solely by reason of earthquake, flood or other natural disaster except where the condition remains for more than three years after the disaster.

(2) The owner of the substandard housing has secured financing to bring the housing into compliance with those laws or codes that have been violated, causing the housing to be classified as substandard, and has commenced repairs or other work necessary to bring the housing into compliance.

(3) The owner of substandard housing that is not within the meaning of housing accommodation, as defined in subdivision (d) of Section 35805 of the Health and Safety Code, has done both of the following:

(A) Attempted to secure
 financing to bring the housing into compliance with those laws or codes that have been violated, causing the housing to be classified as substandard.

(B) Been denied that financing solely because the housing is located in a neighborhood or geographical area in which financial institutions do not provide financing for rehabilitation of any of that type of housing.

(e) The provisions of this section do not apply to deductions from income derived from property rendered substandard solely by reason of a change in applicable state or local housing standards unless those violations cause substantial danger to the occupants of the property, as determined by the regulatory agency which has served notice of violation pursuant to subdivision (b).

(f) The owner of substandard housing found to be in noncompliance shall, upon
 total or partial divestiture of interest in the property, immediately notify the regulatory agency of the name and address of the person or persons to whom the property has been sold or otherwise transferred and the date of the sale or transference.

(g) By July 1 of each year, the regulatory agency shall report to the appropriate legislative body of its jurisdiction all of the following information, for the preceding calendar year, regarding its activities to secure code enforcement, which shall be public information:

(1) The number of written notices of violation issued for substandard housing under subdivision (b).

(2) The number of violations complied with within the period prescribed in subdivision (b).

(3) The number of notices of noncompliance
 issued pursuant to subdivision (c).

(4) The number of appeals from those notices pursuant to subdivision (c).

(5) The number of successful appeals by owners. 

(6) The number of notices of noncompliance mailed to the Franchise Tax Board pursuant to subdivision (c).

(7) The number of cases in which a notice of noncompliance was not sent pursuant to the provisions of subdivision (d).

(8) The number of extensions for compliance granted pursuant to subdivision (b) and the mean average length of the extensions.

(9) The mean average length of time from the issuance of a notice of violation to the mailing of a notice of noncompliance
 to the Franchise Tax Board where the notice is actually sent to the Franchise Tax Board.

(10) The number of cases where compliance is achieved after a notice of noncompliance has been mailed to the Franchise Tax Board.

(11) The number of instances of disallowance of tax deductions by the Franchise Tax Board resulting from referrals made by the regulatory agency. This information may be filed in a supplemental report in succeeding years as it becomes available.

(h) The provisions of this section relating to substandard housing consisting of abandoned or unoccupied dwellings do not apply to any lender engaging in a “federally related transaction,” as defined in Section 11302 of the Business and Professions Code, who acquires title through judicial or nonjudicial foreclosure, or accepts a deed in lieu of foreclosure.
 The exception provided in this subdivision covers only substandard housing consisting of abandoned or unoccupied dwellings involved in the federally related transaction.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 862, Sec. 168.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

24437.

Section 277 of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to deductions incurred by certain membership organizations in transactions with members, shall apply, except as otherwise provided.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 877, Sec. 58.   Effective October 6, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

24438.

(a) No deduction shall be allowed for any interest paid or incurred by a taxpayer during the taxable year with respect to its corporate acquisition indebtedness to the extent that such interest exceeds—

(1) Five million dollars ($5,000,000), reduced by

(2) The amount of interest paid or incurred by such corporation during such year on obligations (A) issued after December 31, 1967, to provide consideration for an acquisition described in paragraph (1) of subdivision (b), but (B) which are not corporate acquisition indebtedness. 

(b) For purposes of this section, the term “corporate acquisition indebtedness” means any obligation evidenced by a bond, debenture, note, or certificate or other evidence of indebtedness issued after October 9, 1969, by a corporation (hereinafter in this section referred to as “issuing corporation”) if—

(1) Such obligation is issued to provide consideration for the acquisition of—

(A) Stock in another corporation (hereinafter in this section referred to as “acquired corporation”),
 or

(B) Assets of another corporation (hereinafter in this section referred to as “acquired corporation”) pursuant to a plan under which at least two-thirds (in value) of all the assets (excluding money) used in trades and businesses carried on by such corporation are acquired,

(2) Such obligation is either—

(A) Subordinated to the claims of trade creditors of the issuing corporation generally, or

(B) Expressly subordinated in right of payment to the payment of any substantial amount of unsecured indebtedness, whether outstanding or subsequently issued, of the issuing corporation,

(3) The bond or other evidence of indebtedness is either—

(A) Convertible directly or indirectly into stock of the issuing corporation, or

(B) Part of an investment unit or other arrangement which includes, in addition to such bond or other evidence of indebtedness, an option to acquire, directly or indirectly, stock in the issuing corporation, and

(4) As of a day determined under paragraph (1) of subdivision (c) either—

(A) The ratio of debt to equity (as defined in paragraph (2) of subdivision (c)) of the issuing corporation exceeds 2 to 1, or

(B) The projected earnings (as defined in paragraph (3) of subdivision (c)), do not exceed three times the annual interest to be paid or incurred (determined under paragraph (4) of subdivision (c)). 

(c) For purposes of paragraph (4) of subdivision (b)—

(1) Determinations are to be made as of the last day of any taxable year of the issuing corporation in which it issues any obligation to provide consideration for an acquisition described in paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of stock in, or assets of, the acquired corporation.

(2) The term “ratio of debt to equity” means the ratio which the total indebtedness of the issuing corporation bears to the sum of its money and all its other assets (in an amount equal to their adjusted basis for determining gain) less such total indebtedness. 

(3) (A) The term “projected earnings” means the “average annual earnings” (as defined in subparagraph (B)) of—

(i) The issuing
 corporation only, if cause (ii) does not apply, or

(ii) Both the issuing corporation and the acquired corporation, in any case where the issuing corporation has acquired control (as defined in Section 24564), or has acquired substantially all of the properties of the acquired corporation. 

(B) The average annual earnings referred to in subparagraph (A) is, for any corporation, the amount of its earnings and profits for any three-year period ending with the last day of a taxable year of the issuing corporation described in paragraph (1), computed without reduction for—

(i) Interest paid or incurred,

(ii) Depreciation or amortization allowed under this part,

(iii) Liability for tax under
 this part, and

(iv) Distributions to which Section 301(c)(1) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to property distributions, applies (other than such distributions from the acquired to the issuing corporation), and reduced to an annual average for such three-year period pursuant to regulations prescribed by the Franchise Tax Board. Such regulations shall include rules for cases where any corporation was not in existence for all of such three-year period or such period includes only a portion of a taxable year of any corporation.

(4) The term “annual interest to be paid or incurred” means—

(A) If subparagraph (B) does not apply, the annual interest to be paid or incurred by the issuing corporation only, determined by reference to its total indebtedness outstanding, or

(B) If projected earnings are determined under clause (ii) of subparagraph (A) of paragraph (3), the annual interest to be paid or incurred by both the issuing corporation and the acquired corporation, determined by reference to their combined total indebtedness outstanding. 

(5) With respect to any corporation which is a bank or is primarily engaged in a lending or finance business—(A) In determining under paragraph (2) the ratio of debt to equity of such corporation (or of the affiliated group of which such corporation is a member), the total indebtedness of such corporation (and the assets of such corporation) shall be reduced by an amount equal to the total indebtedness owed to such corporation which arises out of the banking business of such corporation, or out of the lending
 or finance business of such corporation, as the case may be;(B) In determining under paragraph (4) the annual interest to be paid or incurred by such corporation (or by the issuing and acquired corporations referred to in subparagraph (B) of paragraph (4) or by the affiliated group of which such corporation is a member) the amount of such interest (determined without regard to this paragraph) shall be reduced by an amount which bears the same ratio to the amount of such interest as the amount of the reduction for the taxable year under subparagraph (A) bears to the total indebtedness of such corporation; and(C) In determining under subparagraph (B) of paragraph (3), the average annual earnings, the amount of the earnings and profits for the three-year period shall be reduced by the sum of the
 reductions under subparagraph (B) for such period.For purposes of this paragraph, the term “lending or finance business” means a business of making loans or purchasing or discounting accounts receivable, notes, or installment obligations. 
